Maine, session 132, LD2002.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 5 MRSA §12004-H, sub-§14-A, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 491, §1, is
amended to read:
14-A.
Maine Lobster Marketing Collaborative $55 Per Diem Plus 12 MRSA §6455‑A
Expenses
This subsection is repealed December 31, 2026 2028.
Sec. 2. 12 MRSA §6455-A, sub-§4, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 491, §2 and affected
by §7, is amended by amending the first blocked paragraph to read:
Members are appointed by the commissioner for staggered terms of 3 years. A person may
not serve more than 2 consecutive 3-year terms as a member of the collaborative.
Sec. 3. 12 MRSA §6455-A, sub-§14, as enacted by PL 2021, c. 491, §2, is amended
to read:
14. Repeal. This section is repealed December 31, 2026 2028.
Sec. 4. Report. The Department of Marine Resources shall submit a report to the joint
standing committee of the Legislature having jurisdiction over marine resources matters no
later than January 1, 2028 with an update on the Maine Lobster Marketing Collaborative
as established in the Maine Revised Statutes, Title 12, section 6455-A and work
accomplished by the collaborative in 2026 and 2027. The committee may report out a bill
based on the report to the Second Regular Session of the 133rd Legislature.
Page 1 - 132LR2627(03)